Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
REGISTRATION AND MODIFICATION

OF CHILD
SUPPORT ORDER OF ANOTHER STATE

Note

Part heading amended by L 2015, c 77, pt of §1.

§576B-609 Procedure to register
child support order of another state for modification. A party or support
enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a child support
order issued in another state shall register that order in this State in the
same manner provided in sections 576B-601 through 576B-608 if the order has not
been registered. A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as
a request for registration, or later. The pleading shall specify the grounds
for modification. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next